hunspell/custom.aff
SET UTF-8

# For case-sensitive words
KEEPCASE K

# Use smarter apostrophe handling to distinguish it from punctuation (single quotes)
CHECKAPOSTROPHE

# Plural suffix
SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 s .

# Possessive suffix
SFX P Y 1
SFX P 0 's .

# for -ise -> -isation
SFX T e ation e
SFX T Y 1

# for -ise -> -ised
SFX D 0 d .
SFX D Y 1

# for -ity -> -ities
SFX I y ies y
SFX I Y 1
