hunspell/custom.dic
75
ADR/S
API/S
Backend/S
CD/S
CI/S
CLI/S
CTO/S
Context7
Copilot/S
DD
DDD
Fabrick
GDPR
Gemfile/S
Gilberto
GitHub/S
Homebrew
Jekyll/S
KYB/S
KYC/S
LLM/S
MCP/S
Minima
NC
NonCommercial
PSD/S
PSD2
Penta
Qonto
README/S
Taccari's
Tot
YAML/S
adr/S
ai
api/S
cli/S
cli2
config/S
cookiebot/S
dev/S
dic/S
env/S
fintech/S
frontend/S
gb
gemini
gh
gilbertotcc
github/S
gitignore/S
hunspell
infinitec
io
jekyll/S
json
livereload
localhost
lychee
macOS
markdownlint
md
organizational
plugin/S
repo/S
rigor
startup/S
sudo
taccari/P
toml
tot
utilizes
yaml/S
yml/S
yyyy
